Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 1 General Provisions
62-1-111. Revocation, suspension or refusal to renew license — Other penalties — Hearings — Procedure — Costs.

After notice and hearing pursuant to § 62-1-120, the board may revoke any license issued under § 62-1-107, § 62-1-108 or § 62-1-109 or corresponding provisions of prior law, may suspend the license or refuse to renew the license for a period of no more than five (5) years, may reprimand, censure or limit the scope of practice of any licensee, may impose a civil penalty or may place any licensee on probation, all with or without terms, conditions and limitations, for any one (1) or more of the following reasons:

Fraud or deceit in obtaining a license;

Cancellation, revocation, suspension or refusal to renew a license or practice rights for disciplinary reasons in any other state for any cause;

Failure on the part of a licensee to maintain compliance with the requirements for issuance or renewal of the license or to report changes to the board under § 62-1-107(f) or § 62-1-108(g);

Revocation or suspension of the right to practice before any state or federal agency;

Dishonesty, fraud or gross negligence in the performance of services as a licensee or in the filing or failure to file the licensee's own income tax returns;

Violation of any provision of this chapter or rule promulgated by the board under this chapter or violation of professional standards;

Violation of any rule of professional conduct promulgated by the board;

Conviction of a felony or of any crime an element of which is dishonesty or fraud under the laws of the United States, of this state, or of any other state or country if the acts involved would have constituted a crime under the laws of this state. However, an action taken under this subdivision (a)(8) shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the Fresh Start Act that are compiled in chapter 76, part 1 of this title;

Performance of any fraudulent act while holding a certificate or permit issued under this chapter or prior law;

Any conduct reflecting adversely upon the licensee's fitness to perform services while a licensee;

Making any false or misleading statement or verification in support of an application for a license filed by another; and

Violation of the terms of any lawful order entered by the board.

In lieu of or in addition to any remedy specifically provided in subsection (a), the board may require of a licensee:

A peer review conducted in the fashion that the board may specify; and/or

Satisfactory completion of continuing professional education programs that the board may specify.

The board has the power to sit as a trial board, to summon records and witnesses by subpoena and to compel their attendance, to administer oaths and to pass judgment upon those licensed under this chapter pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. Prior to disciplinary actions against persons licensed under authority of this chapter, the board shall provide written notice to the parties affected by the contemplated disciplinary actions at least thirty (30) days in advance of such action pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act. Parties affected by any contemplated disciplinary action shall be entitled to a full hearing prior to any disciplinary action taken by the board conducted pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, and shall be entitled to be represented by counsel and make such defense as may be proper.

In any proceeding in which a remedy provided by subsection (a) or (b) is imposed, the board may also require the respondent licensee to pay all costs of the proceeding.

In any case where the board renders a decision imposing discipline against a licensee under this section, the board shall examine its records to determine whether the licensee holds a certificate or a permit in any other state; and if so, the board shall notify the board of accountancy of the other state of its decision by mail, within forty-five (45) days of rendering the decision. The board may also furnish information relating to proceedings resulting in disciplinary action to other public authorities and to private professional organizations having a disciplinary interest in the licensee. Where a petition for review has been filed pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, the notification and furnishing of information provided for in this subsection (e) shall await the resolution of the review; and, if resolution is in favor of the licensee, no notification or furnishing of information shall be made.

Acts 1998, ch. 700, § 4; 2018, ch. 745, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 62-1-111 (Acts 1980, ch. 518, § 11; 1984, ch. 669, §§ 2, 3; 1987, ch. 141, § 2; 1987, ch. 351, §§ 6, 8; 1988, ch. 606, §§ 7-10; 1989, ch. 360, § 1; 1989, ch. 443, § 20; 1989, ch. 523, § 105; 1990, ch. 1026, § 35; 1991, ch. 199, § 3; 1992, ch. 712, § 2; 1994, ch. 674, §§ 17-19; 1997, ch. 68, §§ 6-8), concerning board responsibility for implementation and general powers and duties, was repealed by Acts 1998, ch. 700, effective October 1, 1998.

62-1-112. Injunctions and restraining orders.

Whenever, in the judgment of the board, any person has engaged in any acts or practices that constitute a violation of this chapter, the board may make application to the appropriate court in Davidson County or in the county in which the acts occurred, or are alleged to have occurred, for an order enjoining those acts or practices.

Upon a showing by the board that the person has engaged in any such acts or practices, an injunction, restraining order or other such order as may be appropriate may be granted by the court without bond.

“Person,” as used in this section, includes a sole proprietorship, partnership or any other form of business organization authorized under the laws of this or any other state.

Acts 1980, ch. 518, § 12; 1999, ch. 65, § 6.

62-1-113. Prohibited activities.

Only licensees may issue a report on financial statements of any other person, firm, organization or governmental unit or otherwise offer to render or render any attest service. This restriction does not prohibit any act of a public official or public employee in the performance of that person's duties as such, or prohibit the performance by any person of other services involving the use of accounting skills, including the preparation of tax returns, management advisory services and the preparation of financial statements without the issuance of reports thereon.

Licensees performing attest services must provide those services pursuant to statements on standards relating to those services adopted by reference or directly by the board.

No person not holding a valid certificate shall use or assume the title “certified public accountant” or the abbreviation “CPA” or any other title, designation, words, letters, abbreviation, sign, card or device tending to indicate that the person is a certified public accountant.

No firm shall provide attest services or assume or use the title “certified public accountants” or the abbreviation “CPAs,” or any other title, designation, words, letters, abbreviation, sign, card or device tending to indicate that such firm is a CPA firm unless:

The firm holds a valid permit issued under § 62-1-108; and

Ownership of the firm is in accord with this chapter and rules promulgated by the board.

No person shall assume or use the title “public accountant” or the abbreviation “PA,” or any other title, designation, words, letters, abbreviation, sign, card or device tending to indicate that the person is a public accountant unless that person holds a valid registration issued under § 62-1-109.

No firm not holding a valid permit issued under § 62-1-108 shall provide attest services or assume or use the title “public accountant” or the abbreviation “PA,” or any other title, designation, words, letters, abbreviation, sign, card or device tending to indicate that the firm is composed of public accountants.

No person or firm not holding a valid license under this chapter shall assume or use the title “certified accountant,” “chartered accountant,” “enrolled accountant,” “licensed accountant,” “registered accountant,” “accredited accountant” or any other title or designation likely to be confused with the titles “certified public accountant” or “public accountant,” or use any of the abbreviations “CA,” “LA,” “RA,” “AA,” or similar abbreviation likely to be confused with the abbreviations “CPA” or “PA.” The title “enrolled agent” or “EA” may only be used by individuals so designated by the internal revenue service.

Nonlicensees may not use language in any statement relating to the financial affairs of a person or entity that is conventionally used by licensees in reports on financial statements. In this regard, the board shall issue rules providing safe harbor language that nonlicensees may use in connection with the financial information.

No person or firm not holding a valid license issued under § 62-1-107, § 62-1-108 or § 62-1-109 shall assume or use any title or designation that includes the words “accountant” or “accounting,” or any other language, including the language of a report, that implies that the person or firm holds such a license or has special competence as an accountant or auditor; provided, that this subsection (h) does not prohibit any officer, partner, member, manager or employee of any firm or organization from affixing that person's own signature to any statement in reference to the financial affairs of the firm or organization with any wording designating the position, title or office that the person holds in the firm or organization nor prohibit any act of a public official or employee in the performance of the person's duties as a public official or employee.

No person or firm holding a license under this chapter shall use a professional or firm name or designation that is misleading about the legal form of the firm, about the persons who are partners, officers, members, managers or shareholders of the firm or about any other matter; provided, however, that names of one (1) or more former partners, members, managers or shareholders may be included in the name of a firm or its successor.

None of the provisions of subsections (a)-(i) shall have any application to a person or firm holding a certification, designation, degree or license granted in a foreign country entitling the holder of a certification, designation, degree or license granted in a foreign country to engage in the practice of accountancy or its equivalent in that country, whose activities in this state are limited to the provision of professional services to persons or firms who are residents of, governments of or business entities of the country in which the person holds such entitlement, who performs no attest services and who issues no reports with respect to the financial statements of any other persons, firms or governmental units in this state and who does not use in this state any title or designation other than the one under which the person practices in such country, followed by a translation of such title or designation into the English language, if it is in a different language, and by the name of such country.

No holder of a certificate issued under § 62-1-107 or a registration issued under § 62-1-109 shall perform attest services in any firm that does not hold a valid permit issued under § 62-1-108.

Nothing prohibits a licensee from engaging in personal financial planning without further regulatory requirements.

No person shall conceal information relative to violations of this chapter.

Acts 1998, ch. 700, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 62-1-113 (Acts 1980, ch. 518, § 13; 1989, ch. 443, § 21; 1992, ch. 712, § 3; 1994, ch. 674, § 20), concerning office registration, resident managers and nonresident offices, was repealed by Acts 1998, ch. 700, effective October 1, 1998.

62-1-114. Criminal prosecution by attorney general and reporter — Penalties.

Whenever, by reason of an investigation conducted pursuant to this chapter or otherwise, the board has reason to believe that any person or firm has knowingly engaged in acts or practices that constitute a violation of § 62-1-113, the board may bring its information to the attention of the attorney general of any state or other appropriate law enforcement officer who may, in the officer's discretion, cause appropriate criminal proceedings to be brought on the violation.

Any person or firm who knowingly violates § 62-1-113 commits a Class C misdemeanor.

Acts 1998, ch. 700, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 62-1-114 (Acts 1980, ch. 518, § 14; 1984, ch. 669, § 4; 1987, ch. 351, § 18; 1988, ch. 606, §§ 11, 12; 1994, ch. 674, § 21; 1997, ch. 68, § 9), concerning reciprocal permits, was repealed by Acts 1998, ch. 700, effective October 1, 1998.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

62-1-115. Accountant's records as personal property.

Subject to § 62-1-116, all statements, records, schedules, working papers and memoranda incident to or in the course of rendering services to a client, made by a licensee or a partner, shareholder, officer, director, member, manager or employee of a licensee, except the reports submitted by the licensee to the client and except for records that are part of the client's records, shall be and remain the property of the licensee in the absence of an express agreement between the licensee and the client to the contrary. No such statement, record, schedule, working paper or memorandum shall be sold, transferred or bequeathed without the consent of the client or the client's personal representative or assignee to anyone other than one (1) or more surviving partners, stockholders, members or new partners, new stockholders or new members of the licensee, or any combined or merged firm or successor in interest to the licensee. Nothing in this section should be construed as prohibiting any temporary transfer of working papers or other material necessary in the course of carrying out peer reviews or as otherwise interfering with the disclosure of information pursuant to § 62-1-116.

A licensee shall furnish to a client or former client, upon request and reasonable notice:

A copy of the licensee's working papers, to the extent that the working papers include records that would ordinarily constitute part of the client's records and are not otherwise available to the client; and

Any accounting or other records belonging to or obtained from or on behalf of the client that the licensee removed from the client's premises or received for the client's account. The licensee may make and retain copies of the documents of the client when they form the basis for work done by the licensee.

Nothing in this section shall require a licensee to keep any working papers beyond the period prescribed in any other applicable statute.

Acts 1980, ch. 518, § 15; 1998, ch. 700, § 7.

62-1-116. Confidential information.

Licensees shall not divulge, nor shall they in any manner be required to divulge, any information that is communicated to them or obtained by them by the reason of the confidential nature of their employment. The information shall be deemed confidential; provided, however, that nothing in this subsection (a) shall be construed as prohibiting the disclosure of information required to be disclosed by the standards of the public accounting profession in reporting on the examination of financial statements or as prohibiting disclosures in investigations or proceedings under this chapter, in ethical investigations conducted by private professional organizations or in the course of peer reviews, or to other persons active in the organization performing services for that client on a need to know basis or to persons in the entity who need this information for the sole purpose of assuring quality control. Disclosure of confidential information pursuant to this subsection (a) shall not constitute a waiver of the confidential nature of the information for any other purpose.

Information derived as a result of such professional employment is deemed to be confidential, except that nothing in this chapter shall be construed as modifying, changing or affecting the criminal or bankruptcy laws of this state or of the United States.

Acts 1980, ch. 518, § 16; 1998, ch. 700, § 8; 1999, ch. 65, §§ 7, 8, 9.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rule 501 of the Tennessee Rules of Evidence.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 27.78.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 1-34.02-1.

Tennessee Law of Evidence (2nd ed., Cohen, Paine and Sheppeard), Rule 501; § 501.6.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Prohibition of Judge's Comment on Evidence (Donald F. Paine), 35 No. 9 Tenn. B.J. 25 (1999).

Should Tennessee Bury the Dead Man Statute As Arkansas Has? (W. Dent Gitchel), 18 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 195 (1989).

Attorney General Opinions. Application of statutory accountant-client privilege, OAF 97-028 (3/31/97).

62-1-117. Reciprocity.

An individual whose principal place of business is not in this state having a valid license as a certified public accountant from any state that the board or its designee has verified to be in substantial equivalence with the CPA licensure requirements of this chapter shall be presumed to have qualifications substantially equivalent to this state's requirements and shall have all the privileges of licensees of this state without the need to obtain a certificate or permit under § 62-1-107 or § 62-1-108. Notwithstanding any other law, an individual who offers or renders professional services under this section, whether in person, by mail, telephone or electronic means, shall be granted practice privileges in this state; and no notice or other submission shall be provided by the individual. The individual shall be subject to the requirements in subdivision (a)(3).

An individual whose principal place of business is not in this state having a valid license as a certified public accountant from any state that the board or its designee has not verified to be in substantial equivalence with the CPA licensure requirements of this chapter shall be presumed to have qualifications substantially equivalent to this state's requirements and shall have all the privileges of licensees of this state without the need to obtain a certificate or permit under § 62-1-107 or § 62-1-108 if the individual obtains from the board or its designee verification that the individual's CPA qualifications are substantially equivalent to the CPA licensure requirements of this chapter. Notwithstanding any other law, an individual who offers or renders professional services under this section, whether in person, by mail, telephone or electronic means, shall be granted practice privileges in this state; and no notice or other submission shall be provided by the individual. The individual shall be subject to the requirements in subdivision (a)(3).

An individual licensee of another state exercising the privilege afforded under this section and the CPA firm that employs the licensee, as a condition of the grant of this privilege, simultaneously consent to the following:

To the personal and subject matter jurisdiction and disciplinary authority of the board;

To comply with this chapter and the board's rules;

That in the event the license from the state of the individual's principal place of business is no longer valid, the individual shall cease offering or rendering professional services in this state individually and on behalf of a CPA firm; and

To the appointment of the state board that issued the license as the agent upon whom process may be served in the action or proceeding by this board against the licensee.

The board may utilize the service of the NASBA National Qualification Appraisal Service to verify qualifications necessary for substantial equivalency.

A licensee of this state offering or rendering services or using the licensee's CPA title in another state shall be subject to disciplinary action in this state for an act committed in another state for which the licensee would be subject to discipline for an act committed in the other state. The board shall be required to investigate any complaint made by the board of accountancy of another state.

Acts 1998, ch. 700, § 9; 2002, ch. 654, § 9; 2007, ch. 19, §§ 1-3.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 62-1-117 (Acts 1980, ch. 518, § 18; 1987, ch. 351, § 15; 1988, ch. 606, § 15), concerning continuing education and exemptions, was repealed and reenacted, effective October 1, 1998.

62-1-118. Modification of suspension, revocation or refusal to renew license — Reissuance of license.

In any case where the board has suspended or revoked a license or refused to renew a license, the board may, upon application in writing by the person or firm affected and for good cause shown, modify the suspension or reissue the license.

The board shall by rule specify the manner in which applications shall be made, the times within which they shall be made and the circumstances in which hearings will be held on the applications.

Before reissuing or terminating the suspension of a license under this section, and as a condition to the reissuing or termination of suspension, the board may require the applicant to show successful completion of specified continuing professional education; and the board may make the reinstatement of a license conditional and subject to satisfactory completion of a peer review conducted in the fashion that the board may specify.

Acts 1998, ch. 700, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 62-1-118, concerning state and local government work and preparation by certified public accountants and public accountants, was repealed and reenacted, effective October 1, 1998.

62-1-119. [Reserved.]

The Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, governs all matters and procedures respecting the hearing and judicial review of any contested case arising under this chapter.

Acts 1980, ch. 451, § 11.

62-1-121. Fund of the state board of accountancy.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, all moneys collected pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the state treasury in a separate fund to be known as the fund of the state board of accountancy.

Disbursements from the fund shall be made solely for the purpose of defraying expenses incurred in the implementation and enforcement of this chapter.

No such expenses shall be payable from the general fund of the state.

Any part of the fund of the state board of accountancy remaining at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund, but shall be carried forward until expended in accordance with this chapter.

The board shall budget annually in advance its expenditures for programs, services, allocated overhead or charge backs and other normal operating expenses as determined by the board. These expenditures so established shall be budgeted at the beginning of the year by the board, not to exceed the fees to be received by the board, including the excesses accumulated in the fund of the board. The commissioner of finance and administration shall inform the board annually, in advance for budgeting purposes, the allocation of all overhead or charge backs to the board.

Subject to approval of the comptroller of the treasury and the commissioner of finance and administration, the board may also contract for services to carry out this chapter.

Acts 1989, ch. 443, § 23; 1995, ch. 446, § 2; 1998, ch. 700, § 10.

62-1-122. Payments to obtain clients or for referrals.

A licensee shall neither pay any consideration or commission to obtain a client nor accept any consideration or commission for the referral of a client to others when the licensee or the licensee's firm also performs for that client any of the following:

An audit or review of a financial statement;

A compilation of a financial statement when the licensee expects, or reasonably might expect, that a third party will use the financial statement and the licensee's compilation does not disclose a lack of independence; or

An examination of prospective financial information.

The prohibition in subdivision (a)(1) applies during the period in which the licensee is engaged to perform any of the services listed in subdivision (a)(1) and the period covered by any historical financial statements involved in the services listed in subdivision (a)(1).

A licensee who is not prohibited by subdivision (a)(1) from performing services or receiving consideration or a commission and who is paid or expects to be paid consideration or a commission shall disclose that fact in compliance with the requirements of this section to any person who the licensee recommends or refers a product or service to which the commission relates.

Any licensee who accepts consideration or a commission for a referral shall disclose the acceptance or payment to the client in compliance with the requirements of this section.

The board shall promulgate regulations specifying the terms of the disclosures required by subsections (b) and (c) and the manner in which the disclosures shall be made. The regulations shall comply with the following:

The disclosure must be in writing and be clear and conspicuous;

The disclosure must state the amount of the consideration or commission or must state the basis on which it will be computed; and

The disclosure must be made at or prior to the time of the recommendation or referral of the product or service for which consideration or commission is paid or prior to the client retaining the licensee to whom the client has been referred for which a referral fee is paid.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit:

Payments for the purchase of all, or a part, of an accounting practice;

Retirement payments to persons formerly engaged in the practice of accountancy or payments to the heirs or estates of those persons; or

Payments, including incentive or bonus payments, to employees or members of an accounting firm as compensation for their services.

Acts 1990, ch. 927, § 3; 1994, ch. 674, § 25; 1997, ch. 68, § 10; 1998, ch. 700, § 11.

62-1-123. Contingent fee arrangements.

As used in this section, “contingent fee” means a fee established for the performance of any service pursuant to an arrangement under which a fee will not be charged unless a specified finding or result is attained or under which the amount of the fee is otherwise dependent upon the finding or result of such service. “Contingent fee” does not mean a fee fixed by a court or other public authority or a fee related to any tax matter that is based upon the results of a judicial proceeding or the findings of a governmental agency.

A licensee shall not receive or agree to receive a contingent fee from a client for the following:

Performance of any professional services for a client for whom the licensee or person associated with the licensee performs any of the following:

An audit or review of a financial statement;

A compilation of a financial statement when the licensee expects, or reasonably might expect, that a third party will use the financial statement and the licensee's compilation does not disclose a lack of independence; or

An examination of prospective financial information; or

Preparation of an original tax return.

This prohibition applies during the period in which the licensee is engaged to perform any of the services listed in subdivision (b)(1) and the period covered by any historical financial statements involved related to those services.

Any licensee who accepts or agrees to accept a contingent fee shall disclose the terms of the contingent fee to the client in compliance with the requirements of this section.

The board shall promulgate regulations specifying the terms of the disclosures required by subsection (c) and the manner in which the disclosures shall be made. The regulations shall comply with the following:

The disclosure must be in writing and be clear and conspicuous;

The disclosure must state the amount of the contingent fee or must state the basis on which the contingent fee will be computed; and

The disclosure must be made at or prior to the time the licensee undertakes representation of or performance of the service upon which a contingent fee will be charged.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit:

Payments for the purchase of all, or a part, of an accounting practice;

Retirement payments to persons formerly engaged in the practice of accountancy or payments to the heirs or estates of those persons; or

Payments, including incentive or bonus payments, to employees or members of an accounting firm as compensation for their services.

Acts 1990, ch. 927, § 3; 1997, ch. 68, § 11; 1998, ch. 700, § 11.

62-1-124. [Reserved.]

Every licensee shall notify the board in writing within thirty (30) days of:

Any material change in the information previously furnished to or required to be furnished to the board, including, but not limited to, the holder's name or mailing address;

Any conviction by a court of competent jurisdiction of a felony; or

The limitation, suspension or revocation of the right to practice public accountancy by any state board of accountancy or any other state, federal or international agency.

Every office registered pursuant to § 62-1-113 shall notify the board in writing within thirty (30) days of any change of address or location of the office.

Acts 1997, ch. 68, § 12.